Alabama, session 2026rs, HB400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
45 Section 1. For the purposes of this act, the following
46 words have the following meanings:
47 (1) CLEAN CLAIM. A clean electronic claim or a clean
48 written claim.
49 (2) CLEAN ELECTRONIC CLAIM. As defined in Section
50 27-1-17, Code of Alabama 1975.
51 (3) CLEAN WRITTEN CLAIM. As defined in Section 27-1-17,
52 Code of Alabama 1975.
53 (4) COLLECTION. Any written or oral communication made
54 to an enrollee for the purpose of obtaining payment for the
55 services rendered by an emergency medical service provider,
56 including invoicing and legal debt collection efforts.
Page 2

including invoicing and legal debt collection efforts.
HB400 INTRODUCED
57 (5) COST-SHARING AMOUNT. The enrollee's deductible,
58 coinsurance, copayment, or other amount due under a health
59 care benefit plan for covered services.
60 (6) COVERED SERVICES or COVERED SERVICE. Transport or
61 medical services provided by the ground ambulance of an
62 emergency medical service provider which are covered by an
63 enrollee's health care benefit plan, including emergency
64 ground transport and treat in place.
65 (7) EMERGENCY GROUND TRANSPORT. a. When an enrollee is
66 transported by an emergency medical service provider to a
67 hospital or definitive care facility as defined in Section
68 22-18-1, Code of Alabama 1975, and which may include basic
69 life support or advanced life support, in response to a
70 medical condition described in paragraph b.
71 b. An event as defined by the Centers for Medicare and
72 Medicaid Services (CMS) that manifests itself by acute
73 symptoms of sufficient severity, including severe pain, such
74 that a prudent layperson, who possesses an average knowledge
75 of health and medicine, could reasonably expect the absence of
76 immediate medical attention to result in:
77 1. Placing the patient's health in serious jeopardy;
78 2. Serious impairment to bodily functions; or
79 3. Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.
80 (8) EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICE PROVIDER or PROVIDER. Any
81 public or private organization that is licensed to provide
82 emergency medical services as defined in Section 22-18-1, Code
83 of Alabama 1975.
84 (9) ENROLLEE. An individual who is covered by a health
Page 3

(9) ENROLLEE. An individual who is covered by a health
HB400 INTRODUCED
85 care benefit plan.
86 (10) HEALTH CARE BENEFIT PLAN. Any individual or group
87 plan, policy, or contract issued, delivered, or renewed in
88 this state by a health care insurer to provide, deliver,
89 arrange for, pay for, or reimburse health care services,
90 including those provided by an emergency medical service
91 provider, except for payments for health care made under
92 automobile or homeowners' insurance plan, accident-only plan,
93 specified disease plan, long-term care plan, supplemental
94 hospital or fixed indemnity plan, dental or vision plan, or
95 Medicaid.
96 (11) HEALTH CARE INSURER. Any entity that issues or
97 administers a health care benefit plan, including a health
98 care insurer, a health care services plan incorporated under
99 Chapter 20 of Title 10A, Code of Alabama 1975, a health
100 maintenance organization established under Chapter 21A of
101 Title 27, Code of Alabama 1975, or a nonprofit agricultural
102 organization that offers health benefits to its membership
103 pursuant to Chapter 33 of Title 2, Code of Alabama 1975.
104 (12) IN-NETWORK. When an emergency medical service
105 provider is in a contract with a health care insurer to
106 provide covered services in the health care insurer's provider
107 network.
108 (13) OUT-OF-NETWORK. When an emergency medical service
109 provider does not have a contract with a health care insurer
110 to provide covered services in the health care insurer's
111 provider network.
112 (14) TREAT IN PLACE. An emergency response event in
Page 4

(14) TREAT IN PLACE. An emergency response event in
HB400 INTRODUCED
113 which an emergency medical service provider assesses an
114 enrollee or Medicaid recipient and renders basic life support
115 at his or her location without emergency ground transport.
116 Section 2. (a)(1) A health care insurer shall contract
117 with any willing emergency medical service provider to provide
118 covered services in the health care insurer's provider network
119 under terms extended to comparable providers that are
120 in-network.
121 (2) An in-network provider shall meet licensing
122 requirements provided by law.
123 (b)(1) Beginning October 1, 2026, the minimum
124 reimbursement from a health insurer to an emergency medical
125 service provider that is in-network for emergency ground
126 transport shall be 200 percent of the Medicare Ambulance Fee
127 Schedule rate as published by the Centers for Medicare &
128 Medicaid Services (CMS).
129 (2)a. Beginning October 1, 2026, the minimum
130 reimbursement from a health insurer to an emergency medical
131 service provider that is in-network for treat in place shall
132 be 200 percent of the Medicare Ambulance Fee Schedule rate for
133 basic life support as published by CMS which is in effect on
134 January 1, 2027.
135 b. Submission of a claim for reimbursement for treat in
136 place is prohibited if the emergency medical service provider
137 has submitted a claim for emergency ground transport for the
138 same event or occurrence.
139 (c) Beginning January 1, 2027, the minimum
140 reimbursement amount from a health care insurer to an
Page 5

reimbursement amount from a health care insurer to an
HB400 INTRODUCED
141 emergency medical service provider that is out-of-network for
142 covered services shall be 180 percent of the Medicare
143 Ambulance Fee Schedule rate as published by CMS.
144 (d)(1) For purposes of this section, the Medicare
145 Ambulance Fee Schedule rate shall be the rate applicable to
146 zip code 35462, including the applicable Medicare base rate
147 and mileage components.
148 (2) The reimbursement rate established under this
149 section shall be applied uniformly on a statewide basis,
150 without regard to the geographic locality, population density,
151 or zip code in which the ground ambulance service is
152 furnished.
153 Section 3. (a)(1) Payment in accordance with Section 2
154 shall be payment in full for covered services.
155 (2) An emergency medical service provider, whether
156 in-network or out-of-network, including the provider's agent,
157 contractor, or assignee, may not bill or seek collection of
158 any amount from an enrollee except for the enrollee's
159 in-network cost-sharing amount.
160 (3) The health care insurer shall certify an enrollee's
161 in-network cost-sharing amount to an out-of-network provider
162 upon request.
163 (b)(1) Not later than 30 days after receipt of a clean
164 electronic claim, or not later than 45 days after receipt of a
165 clean written claim, a health care insurer shall remit payment
166 to an out-of-network emergency medical service provider and
167 shall not send payment to an enrollee.
168 (2) If a claim for reimbursement submitted by an
Page 6

(2) If a claim for reimbursement submitted by an
HB400 INTRODUCED
169 emergency medical service provider to a health care insurer is
170 not a clean claim, not later than 30 days after receiving the
171 claim, the health care insurer shall send the provider a
172 written receipt acknowledging the claim, accompanied with one
173 of the following applicable statements:
174 a. The insurer is declining to pay all or a part of the
175 claim, with the specific reason for the denial.
176 b. Additional information is necessary to determine if
177 the claim is payable, with the specific additional information
178 that is required.
179 (3) In no event shall a health care insurer require the
180 provider to submit either of the following as a condition to
181 the acceptance and processing of an initial claim as a clean
182 claim:
183 a. Data elements in excess of those required on the
184 standard electronic health insurance claim format designated
185 by Section 27-1-16, Code of Alabama 1975.
186 b. Information or data elements in excess of those
187 required on the standard health insurance claim form
188 designated by Section 27-1-16, Code of Alabama 1975.
189 (4) Any dispute between a health care insurer and an
190 emergency medical service provider over the amount to be paid,
191 or over full or partial denial of a claim, may be settled by
192 one of the following means:
193 a. Affording the provider access to the insurer's
194 internal forum for resolving provider disputes concerning
195 coverage and reimbursement amounts.
196 b. Selecting an independent dispute resolution
Page 7

b. Selecting an independent dispute resolution
HB400 INTRODUCED
197 contractor mutually agreeable to the insurer and the provider.
198 Section 4. (a) Beginning in the year 2028, and in each
199 year thereafter, an emergency medical service provider shall
200 submit to the Alabama Department of Public Health a report
201 that includes, but is not limited to, the following
202 information for the preceding calendar year:
203 (1) The number and type of emergency medical service
204 vehicles that are in service.
205 (2) The number of employees, both full-time and
206 part-time, classified by position or emergency medical service
207 provider license classification.
208 (3) The total number of ground ambulance transports
209 rendered.
210 (4) The average response time for collecting and
211 transporting a patient to a definitive care facility.
212 (5) The gross income received by the emergency medical
213 service provider in the State of Alabama and the net profit.
214 (6) If the emergency medical service provider
215 distributes ownership shares to the public, the number and
216 amount of dividends issued.
217 (7) For the calendar year 2027, the amount of receipts
218 collected by the emergency medical service provider that are
219 remitted to a parent entity, both before and after
220 implementation of any change in payment or reimbursement by a
221 health care insurer.
222 (8) For the calendar year 2027, the amount paid or
223 reimbursed to an emergency medical service provider by health
224 care insurers, presented on a monthly or quarterly basis.
Page 8

care insurers, presented on a monthly or quarterly basis.
HB400 INTRODUCED
225 (b)(1) Beginning in the year 2027, a health care
226 insurer shall submit to the Alabama Department of Public
227 Health a report on claims for reimbursement submitted by
228 emergency medical service providers which presents, for each
229 of the three calendar years preceding January 1, 2027:
230 a. The number of denied claims;
231 b. The aggregate dollar value of denied claims;
232 c. The percentage of denied claims to approved claims;
233 d. The applicable out-of-pocket charge under each
234 health care benefit plan issued by the health care insurer on
235 an approved claim for covered services; and
236 e. The total amount paid on claims for covered
237 services, including in comparison to the total amount paid out
238 on all claims for health care services.
239 (2) Beginning in the year 2028, and in each year
240 thereafter, a health care insurer shall submit to the Alabama
241 Department of Public Health a report that includes, but may
242 not be limited to, each item of information required under
243 subdivision (1) for the preceding calendar year.
244 (c) The financial information required for submission
245 under subsections (a) and (b) shall be confidential and may
246 not be made public by the Alabama Department of Public Health
247 or any contractor of the department.
248 (d) The Alabama Department of Public Health shall adopt
249 rules to implement this section, and may prescribe reporting
250 periods, deadlines, or formatting of information to be
251 reported, and may require an emergency medical service
252 provider or health care insurer to submit operational and
Page 9

provider or health care insurer to submit operational and
HB400 INTRODUCED
253 financial data or information in addition to the information
254 required under subsections (a) and (b).
255 Section 5. (a) The Alabama Department of Public Health
256 shall contract with a consultant with expertise in health care
257 delivery and health care financing to study the impact of
258 Sections 1 through 4 on the provision of emergency medical
259 services.
260 (b) The consultant shall produce a report on the
261 findings, which shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars
262 ($50,000) in cost, the cost to be borne by the three largest
263 health care insurers as measured by the number of enrollees in
264 the state, and which also offer individual health care benefit
265 plans on the Health Insurance Marketplace.
266 (c) In addition to findings on the impact of Sections 1
267 through 4 on the provision of emergency medical services, the
268 report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
269 (1) Measures taken by other states on the provision of
270 emergency medical services and the effectiveness of those
271 measures.
272 (2) Recommendations of measures that would balance the
273 goals of ensuring adequate access to emergency medical
274 services with the cost burden of such measures on the state,
275 its employers, and residents.
276 (d) The report shall be submitted to the President Pro
277 Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
278 Representatives no later than December 1, 2028.
279 Section 6. Sections 1 through 5 are repealed on June 1,
280 2029.
Page 10

2029.
HB400 INTRODUCED
281 Section 7. Sections 10A-20-6.16 and 27-21A-23, Code of
282 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
283 "§10A-20-6.16
284 (a) No statute of this state applying to insurance
285 companies shall be applicable to any corporation organized
286 under this article and amendments thereto or to any contract
287 made by the corporation; except the corporation shall be
288 subject to the following:
289 (1) The provisions regarding annual premium tax to be
290 paid by insurers on insurance premiums.
291 (2) Chapter 55 of Title 27.
292 (3) Article 2 and Article 3 of Chapter 19 of Title 27.
293 (4) Section 27-1-17.
294 (5) Chapter 56 of Title 27.
295 (6) Rules adopted by the Commissioner of Insurance
296 pursuant to Sections 27-7-43 and 27-7-44.
297 (7) Chapter 54 of Title 27.
298 (8) Chapter 57 of Title 27.
299 (9) Chapter 58 of Title 27.
300 (10) Chapter 59 of Title 27.
301 (11) Chapter 54A of Title 27.
302 (12) Chapter 12A of Title 27.
303 (13) Chapter 2B of Title 27.
304 (14) Chapter 29 of Title 27.
305 (15) Chapter 62 of Title 27.
306 (16) Chapter 63 of Title 27.
307 (17) Chapter 45A of Title 27.
308 (18) Sections 1 through 5.
Page 11

(18) Sections 1 through 5.
HB400 INTRODUCED
309 (b) The provisions in subsection (a) that require
310 specific types of coverage to be offered or provided shall not
311 apply when the corporation is administering a self-funded
312 benefit plan or similar plan, fund, or program that it does
313 not insure."
314 "§27-21A-23
315 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter,
316 provisions of the insurance law and provisions of health care
317 service plan laws shall not be applicable to any health
318 maintenance organization granted a certificate of authority
319 under this chapter. This provision shall not apply to an
320 insurer or health care service plan licensed and regulated
321 pursuant to the insurance law or the health care service plan
322 laws of this state except with respect to its health
323 maintenance organization activities authorized and regulated
324 pursuant to this chapter.
325 (b) Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance
326 organization granted a certificate of authority shall not be
327 construed to violate any provision of law relating to
328 solicitation or advertising by health professionals.
329 (c) Any health maintenance organization authorized
330 under this chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing
331 medicine and shall be exempt from the provisions of Section
332 34-24-310, et seq., relating to the practice of medicine.
333 (d) No person participating in the arrangements of a
334 health maintenance organization other than the actual provider
335 of health care services or supplies directly to enrollees and
336 their families shall be liable for negligence, misfeasance,
Page 12

their families shall be liable for negligence, misfeasance,
HB400 INTRODUCED
337 nonfeasance, or malpractice in connection with the furnishing
338 of such services and supplies.
339 (e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed in any
340 way to repeal or conflict with any provision of the
341 certificate of need law.
342 (f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), a
343 health maintenance organization shall be subject to all of the
344 following:
345 (1) Section 27-1-17.
346 (2) Chapter 56.
347 (3) Chapter 54.
348 (4) Chapter 57.
349 (5) Chapter 58.
350 (6) Chapter 59.
351 (7) Rules adopted by the Commissioner of Insurance
352 pursuant to Sections 27-7-43 and 27-7-44.
353 (8) Chapter 12A.
354 (9) Chapter 54A.
355 (10) Chapter 2B.
356 (11) Chapter 29.
357 (12) Chapter 62.
358 (13) Chapter 63.
359 (14) Chapter 45A
360 (15) Sections 1 through 5."
361 Section 8. This act shall become effective on October
362 1, 2026.
Page 13